Hawaii, session 2026, SB478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-143.5[]]  Low-speed electric bicycles; operator [age.] requirements.  No person [under the age of fifteen] shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085[.] unless the person: (1)  Is fifteen years of age or older; and (2)  Is in immediate possession of a valid driver's license, instruction permit, or provisional license at all times." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________